New York, session 2025-2026, A429.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 235-j of the real property law, as added by a chap- 2 ter of the laws of 2024 amending the real property law relating to 3 requiring landlords and lessors provide notice to tenants about bed bug 4 infestation, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 9227 and A. 5 9329, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 235-j. Duty to inform of bed bug infestation. 1. Upon having know- 7 ledge of a bed bug infestation in a unit of a residential rental prem- 8 ises, the landlord or lessor of a residential rental premises shall 9 provide [all tenants and lessees on such premises] written notice of 10 such infestation to the landlord's tenants and lessees who reside in 11 units on the premises immediately above, immediately below, and imme- 12 diately adjacent to the infested unit. Such written notice shall be 13 provided to [the] such tenants and lessees within [twenty-four] seven- 14 ty-two hours of the landlord or lessor having knowledge of the bed bug 15 infestation. 16 2. Upon having knowledge of a bed bug infestation in a common area of 17 a residential rental premises, the landlord or lessor of the residential 18 rental premises shall place notice of such infestation in a conspicuous 19 location accessible to all tenants and lessees residing in the premises 20 within seventy-two hours of the landlord or lessor having knowledge of 21 the bed bug infestation. 22 3. Any notice required to be provided pursuant to subdivision one of 23 this section shall not identify the infested unit or contain any EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02710-01-5 A. 429 2 1 personally identifying information of the tenant or tenants whose unit 2 experienced the bed bug infestation. 3 4. Subdivisions one and two of this section shall not apply to a land- 4 lord or lessor that is subject to notice and remediation obligations 5 related to bed bug infestations pursuant to a judicial order, legal 6 settlement, or binding agreement with a federal, state, or local regula- 7 tory entity while such judicial order, legal settlement, or binding 8 agreement is in effect. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 10 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the real property law 11 relating to requiring landlords and lessors provide notice to tenants 12 about bed bug infestation, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 13 9227 and A. 9329, takes effect.